Mississippi statutes. Title 21. Municipalities
Article 1. General Municipal Employees’ Retirement.

§ 21-29-1.
Short title.

This article may be cited as the “General Municipal Employees’ Retirement Law.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-01; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 1.

§ 21-29-3.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases when used in this article, unless a different meaning is plainly required by the context, shall have the following meanings:

“Retirement system” shall mean a retirement system as authorized by this article;

“Board” shall mean the retirement board provided for in this article to administer the retirement system;

“Municipality” shall mean any city, as defined by Section 21-1-1 which has a population of twenty-one thousand (21,000), or more;

“Governing body” shall mean the legislative body, board or commission of any municipality, as defined in subsection (c) of this section;

“Employer” shall mean a municipality, as defined in subsection (c) of this section, which has elected, as by this article provided, to provide a retirement system;

“Employee” shall mean all administrative and other employees on a monthly salary basis, excepting policemen, firemen, and school teachers;

“Member” shall mean any municipal employee included in the membership of the retirement system;

“Beneficiary” shall mean any person in receipt of an annuity, pension, or retirement allowance granted under the provisions of this article;

“Compensation” shall mean the remuneration paid the employee in cash or warrant out of public funds in return for his services to the employer, plus the monetary value, as determined by the governing body, of whatever living quarters or other thing of monetary value the employer furnishes him in return for his services. Compensation in addition to an employee’s base salary that is paid to the employee at the time of his retirement for unused accumulated annual leave, sick leave or both, pursuant to the vacation and sick leave policies of the employer, shall be excluded from the calculation of compensation under this article;

“Accumulated contributions” shall mean the sum of all amounts deducted from the compensation of a member and credited to his individual account in the employees’ savings fund, together with interest thereon as by this article provided;

“Service” shall mean time spent as an employee of one (1) employer, the time spent in the employ of one (1) employer under this article not being transferable nor to be considered by any other employer under this article. Service shall not include any unused accumulated annual leave, sick leave or both that any employee has at the time of his retirement pursuant to the vacation and sick leave policies of the employer;

“Prior service” shall mean time spent in the employ of an employer, under this article, prior to the effective date of the retirement system; provided, the time spent in the employ of one (1) employer under this article may not be transferable nor considered by any other employer under this article.

Words of the masculine gender shall include words of the feminine gender and vice versa, and words of the singular number in relation to persons shall include the plural number and vice versa.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-02; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 2; Laws, 1992, ch. 394 § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 27, 1992).

§ 21-29-5.
Creation of City Employees Retirement Fund; election to come under provisions of article.

In every municipality of the State of Mississippi, operating under a commission form of government as of March 31, 1948, and having a population of twenty-one thousand or more, according to the 1940 federal census, and in every municipality bordering on tide water and having a population of more than fifteen thousand, it shall be the duty of the governing body of said municipality to create and maintain a fund known as the “City Employees Retirement Fund,” which shall be maintained for the benefits of certain city employees hereinafter named and which shall be derived, raised and administered in the manner hereinafter provided.

In any municipality coming under the provisions of this article, upon a petition signed by twenty per cent of the qualified electors of such municipality, protesting against the operation of this article and petitioning for an election thereon to determine whether a majority of the qualified electors of such municipality desire for such municipality to come from under the terms of this article, providing such petition is filed with the governing body of such municipality by July 29, 1948, the municipal authorities of such municipality shall call an election by August 28, 1948, after giving notice for three consecutive weeks, as to whether the municipality desires to come from under the provisions of this article. At said election, the ballots used by the qualified electors shall read: “For the Retirement Fund for the City Employees,” “Against the Retirement Fund for the City Employees.” Said election shall be held as such other elections of like nature, and if at such election a majority of those participating thereat shall vote against the retirement fund for the city employees, then this article shall not apply to such municipality. If no petition is filed as above provided, the governing body of said municipality shall by August 28, 1948, pass the required ordinance to begin the operation of said retirement system in accordance with the provisions hereof.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, §§ 3652.3-03, 3652.3-04; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, §§ 3, 4.

§ 21-29-7.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 35, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

[Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-26; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 26]

§ 21-29-9.
Board of the General Retirement System; advisory board.

The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi is hereby constituted a board, which shall be known as the Board of the General Retirement System of_______________ .

The governing body of a municipality may appoint a board of not more than five (5) members who shall be representative of the membership of the retirement system. Such board shall serve in an advisory capacity to the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-04; Laws, 1946, ch. 386, § 4; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 1, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-11.
Powers and duties of board.

The general administration and responsibility for the proper operation of the retirement system and for making effective the provisions of this article are hereby vested in the board, the members of which shall serve without compensation except as otherwise provided by law. The board shall organize and adopt such rules and regulations as it may deem necessary and promptly do such things as may properly be done.

The board shall have, in addition to all others, the following rights, powers and duties:

It shall keep minutes of its proceedings which shall be open to public inspection;

Fix a time for regular meetings and provide for the means of calling special meetings;

A majority of all of the board members present shall constitute a quorum for transaction of the affairs of the board;

To hear, consider and pass upon all applications coming before it and order payments as provided by this article, and the board may hear witnesses and administer oaths, appoint hearing officers and make decisions in all matters properly before said board;

It shall have full power to invest and reinvest the funds of the retirement system under the provisions of Section 25-11-121. Moreover, said board shall have full power to order the custodian of securities and funds hereafter designated to hold, purchase, sell, assign, transfer and dispose of any of the securities and investments in which any of the funds created herein shall have been invested, as well as the proceeds of said investments and all moneys belonging to said funds. The funds held by the board may be commingled with other Public Employees’ Retirement System investments for the most advantageous investments;

It shall annually determine and allow interest on each individual account in the employees’ saving fund based on the average percentage of interest earned from investment or deposit of all funds of the retirement system. However, the interest to be credited to such individual accounts shall not exceed one percent (1%) per annum.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-05; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 5; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 2, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-13.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 35, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

[Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-24; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 24]

§ 21-29-15.
Statement of clerk of municipality; issuance of prior service certificates.

The clerk of said employer shall, within thirty (30) days after the effective date of the ordinance of the municipality to be passed as provided in Section 21-29-5, prepare a statement showing the length of service of employees, prior to effective date of said ordinance, then employed by the employer and the total salaries or wages paid each in cash or warrants during the four (4) years of employment by the employer next before said effective date of said ordinance. Such facts shall, subject to correction after each employee is given ten (10) days within which to check and prove to the board any error therein, be the basis for the board to approve the issuance of prior service certificates and records and to determine the sum each prior service employee electing to come within the retirement system shall deposit in the employees’ savings fund. The secretary of the board shall, upon approval of the board, issue to each employee a prior service certificate. The clerk of the employer shall have the duty of keeping all service records and all records on the various funds provided by this article. The clerk shall on or before July 1, 1987, forward all service records and funds to the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-06; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 6; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 3, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-17.
Membership.

The membership of the retirement system shall be composed as follows:

All persons who become employees after the date fixed in the ordinance of the governing body for the retirement system to go into effect shall become members of the retirement system on the expiration of two (2) months from date of employment; however, persons who have reached the age of forty (40) years who have not had prior service or membership service which may be reinstated as hereinafter provided shall not be members of the retirement system.

All persons who are employees of the municipality, and who are members of the general municipal employees’ retirement system shall come under the provisions and benefits of this article and shall receive all benefits provided for in this article. The municipality shall each month deduct from the total compensation of each member not less than seven percent (7%) nor more than ten percent (10%) of the amount thereof, and put the amounts deducted in the employees’ savings fund. Any increase to an amount in excess of seven percent (7%) shall be in increments of not more than one percent (1%) per annum. No increase from the deduction of seven percent (7%) shall be made unless the municipality determines that the avails of a levy of three (3) mills, when combined with the avails of the deduction of seven percent (7%), is insufficient to keep the system actuarially sound.

In lieu of the other provisions of this article, any municipality operating under the provisions of this article on March 1, 1976, may, by a resolution duly adopted and entered upon its minutes, enter into an agreement with the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi whereby all new firemen and policemen employed or reemployed after the effective date of such agreement shall be included in the provisions of such agreement for retirement purposes to the same extent as are other employees covered by the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

No new member may be joined after July 1, 1987, and all new employees of the municipality who are employed after July 1, 1987, shall be covered by the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-07; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 7; Laws, 1976, ch. 463, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 4, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-19.
Cessation of membership.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, should a member separate from the service of an employer or should he become a beneficiary or die, he shall thereupon cease to be a member and any prior service and membership service which may be credited to his service account at the time of his separation from the service of the employer shall be forfeited by him. Should such person again become an employee of the same employer within a period of five (5) years following the date of his last separation from the service of such employer, he shall again become a member of the retirement system, if not otherwise by this article prevented, conditioned on his redepositing at time of reemployment, and not afterwards, any part of his accumulated contributions theretofore withdrawn from the employees’ savings fund, and any prior service and membership service which may have been credited to him at the time of his separation from service shall be restored to him. However, that in the case of the reemployment of a duty disability retirant neither the limitation of five (5) years nor the redepositing of any sum withdrawn from the employees’ savings fund shall apply.

The provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to any employees of a municipality who are employed after adoption of a resolution in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of Section 21-29-17. However, under the provisions of the agreement between the municipality and the public employees’ retirement system, after the employee has been actively employed for a period of four (4) years and reported as a member of the public employees’ retirement system of Mississippi, he may pay the employee contributions, the employer contributions and interest as determined by the public employees’ retirement system of Mississippi based on the earnings during the previous period of service with the municipality and receive creditable service for such prior service in the public employees’ retirement system of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-19; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 19; Laws, 1976, ch. 463, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1976).

§ 21-29-21.
Refunds to members withdrawing from service.

Should any member cease to be an employee before becoming eligible to receive either a service or disability retirement allowance as provided by this article, for reasons other than becoming a beneficiary or his death, he thereafter, at any time while not a member of the system, may request in writing, of the board a refund to him of his accumulated contributions, whereupon one hundred percent (100%) of his accumulated contributions then credited to his individual account in the employees’ savings fund, less and except all interest credited to his individual account, shall be refunded to him within one (1) year from the filing of the request. However, from the date of separation of any employee, no further interest shall be credited to his individual account in said fund by the board unless and until such employee again becomes a member of the retirement system.

Should any former member, who has accumulated contributions remaining in the employees’ savings fund, die, or any member die before his retirement becomes effective, one hundred percent (100%) of the amount of his accumulated contributions standing to his credit in the employees’ savings fund, including the accumulated interest therein at the rate of one percent (1%) per annum, at the time of his death shall be paid to such person or persons as shall have been nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the board. If there be no such designated person or persons, then one hundred percent (100%) of the amount of his accumulated contributions shall be paid to his legal representative. However, such payments shall be postponed, at the discretion of the board, for not more than eighteen (18) months.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-20; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 20; Laws, 1972, ch. 370, § 8; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 5, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-23.
Funds.

All funds provided for herein shall be part of the public funds of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and shall be kept in such way as it is required by law to keep its funds. All allowances or withdrawals from such funds shall be drawn against such funds by the rules and regulations of the Public Employees’ Retirement System. All securities purchased with money of the various funds under this article shall be purchased in the name of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and held as are other securities of the Public Employees’ Retirement System. The Public Employees’ Retirement System shall maintain separate municipal accounts for each fund. The following funds shall be set up by any municipality operating under the provisions of this article:

Employees’ saving fund.— The employees’ saving fund shall be the fund in which shall be accumulated the contribution from the compensation of the members and the contributions of members who have prior service to provide for the maintenance, by the clerk of the employer, of an individual account with each member showing the amount of the member’s contributions credited to his account and showing interest credited to his account as by the board directed. The portion of the accumulated contributions of a member returned to him upon his withdrawing from service, or paid to his designated beneficiary or legal representative in event of his death, as provided in Sections 21-29-19 and 21-29-21, shall be paid from the employees’ saving fund and charged against his individual account therein and the balance then standing in his name in his individual account in said fund shall be transferred to the retirement reserve fund and his individual account closed. The contribution of each member to the employees’ saving fund, beginning with the effective date of the retirement system as fixed by ordinance of the governing body, shall be four percent (4%) of his compensation. The employer shall cause the said contribution to be deducted from the cash compensation of each member on each and every payroll period, so long as he remains a member of the retirement system. Every member shall be deemed to consent and agree to the deductions made and provided for herein, and his receipt for his full compensation and payment less said deduction shall be a full and complete discharge and acquittance of all claims and demands whatsoever for the services rendered by such member during the period covered by such payment, except as to benefits provided under this article. The employer shall, within five (5) days following the end of each calendar month, forward the member contributions deducted from the compensation of each member during the preceding calendar month to the Public Employees’ Retirement System, to be placed in the employees’ saving fund.

Retirement reserve fund.— The Public Employees’ Retirement System shall place in the retirement reserve fund all taxes levied and collected pursuant to the provisions of Section 21-29-27. All retirement and disability allowances shall be paid from this fund.

Income Fund.— All interest and other income derived from the deposits and investments authorized by this article shall be paid into the income fund.

The board shall annually allow interest for the preceding year to the individual accounts of members of the employees’ savings fund based on the average interest and income received from the investment and deposit of the moneys of the employees’ savings fund and the retirement reserve fund, provided that the allowed interest on contributions made by members within any one (1) year shall be computed, beginning on the first day of the fiscal year next following, and shall be computed at the end of the fiscal year. Within thirty (30) days after the end of each fiscal year the allowed interest on the accounts in the employees’ savings fund shall be credited to the individual accounts of the members and the total thereof placed in the employees’ savings fund and any balance of such interest and income shall be placed in the retirement reserve fund. All costs incidental to the investment of funds shall be paid out of this fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-08; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 8; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 6, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-25.
Expenses of operation of retirement system.

All expenses of the operation of the retirement system shall be paid out of the retirement reserve fund provided by Section 21-29-23. The Public Employees’ Retirement System is hereby authorized to deduct two percent (2%) of all income, exclusive of employee contributions, to be transferred to the expense fund of the Public Employees’ Retirement System of Mississippi to defray the costs of administering the fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-25; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 25; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 7, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-27.
Taxes to meet system requirements; transfer of funds.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the governing body of a municipality, after the passage of the ordinance provided for in Section 21-29-5, shall annually levy a tax as certified by the Public Employees’ Retirement System on the taxable property within the municipality or use other funds available, to enable it to meet the requirements of the retirement system. The levy made, or other funds made available, for the municipality’s contribution to the system shall be in an amount sufficient to make the system actuarially sound. The tax herein authorized is in addition to all other taxes authorized by law, and may be increased by no more than one-half (1/2) mill per year as certified by the Public Employees’ Retirement System; however, if any levy to pay debt service on bonds issued under Section 31-25-21 as described in subsection (2) of this section is reduced for any year as a result of payment of the bonds or otherwise, the levy under this subsection (1) for such year may be increased by an amount, in addition to the one-half (1/2) mill otherwise authorized, not to exceed the reduction for such year in the millage levied to pay debt service on the bonds.

In addition to, or in lieu of, the method of funding provided for in subsection (1) of this section, the municipality may fund or assist in funding the retirement system through the use of revenue bonds issued pursuant to Section 31-25-21. Any tax levied to service the debt on such bonds shall not be included in the ten percent (10%) limitation on increases under Section 27-39-321.

Each municipality with a general municipal employees’ retirement fund shall be provided an actuarial study of the fund at least every four (4) years by the Public Employees’ Retirement System, which shall report the findings to the Legislature of the State of Mississippi. The first such study shall be filed with the Legislature in January 1980.

The Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, when any municipality has enacted an enabling ordinance as provided in Sections 21-29-5 and 21-29-101, upon a finding that either the municipal employees’ retirement system or the disability and relief fund for firemen and policemen is not funded in an actuarially sound manner which shall be spread upon the minutes of the board, may by order provide that the revenue or a portion thereof produced by the levy authorized for one (1) system be diverted to fund the less actuarially sound system within the same municipality. No transfer may be made of funds from one (1) municipality to another.

The municipality and the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System may enter into such contracts and agreements as are deemed necessary to implement the provisions of this section, including, but not limited to, contracts and agreements addressing the use, application and investment of proceeds of bonds issued under Section 31-25-21 and earnings thereon and the relative rights and obligations of the municipality and the Public Employees’ Retirement System during the period that the bonds are outstanding and thereafter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-09; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 9; Laws, 1976, ch. 463, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 441, § 1; Laws, 1985, ch. 536, § 6; Laws, 1986, ch. 509, § 1; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 8; Laws, 1994, ch. 548, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 506, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1997).

§ 21-29-29.
Discontinuance, reduction, or reassessment of taxes.

When the amount of funds derived from the tax levied pursuant to Section 21-29-27 is sufficient to care for current needs, requirements, and necessities, the governing body of said municipality is authorized, empowered and directed to discontinue entirely or reduce the tax rate herein provided until such time as financial necessity creates a demand for the reassessment of said tax. However, when and if the tax collections as herein provided, are discontinued, said tax shall be reassessed when necessity requires, without the necessity of an election. The governing body of the municipality may take action only upon certification from the Board of Trustees of the Public Employees’ Retirement System.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-10; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 10; Laws, 1987, ch. 511, § 9, eff from and after April 30, 1987.

§ 21-29-31.
Service retirement.

After the expiration of four (4) years from the effective date of an employer’s operation under this article, any member who has been an employee of the employer, to whom application is made, for twenty (20) years or more, whether continuous or not, provided the last seven (7) years of which service shall have been continuous, may retire upon his written application to the board setting forth at what time, not less than thirty (30) nor more than ninety (90) days subsequent to the filing thereof, he desires to be retired. The board shall grant him the benefits under Section 21-29-33 to which he is entitled because of the service retirement. It shall be mandatory that any member retire after he attains the age of seventy (70) years.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-11; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 11; Laws, 1972, ch. 370, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 21-29-33.
Service retirement allowance.

Upon retirement from service as provided in Section 21-29-31 a member shall receive a service retirement allowance for the remainder of his life, payable monthly, which allowance shall be a sum equal to fifty percent (50%) of his average monthly salary for the last four (4) years of service immediately prior to retirement; provided, however, that upon retirement from service in any municipality having a commission form of government on March 31, 1948, as provided in Section 21-29-5 and having a separate firemen and policemen retirement system and having a population not in excess of 48,000 according to the 1980 decennial census, which municipality has established a retirement system according to the provisions of this chapter, the service retirement allowance shall be based upon the average monthly salary for the last two (2) years of service immediately prior to retirement. Any member who has been in paid service for longer than twenty (20) years shall be entitled to receive additional payments for life in a sum equal to one and seven-tenths percent (1.7%) of the average monthly salary received by such member in the two-year period next preceding the filing of said application for each full year of service in excess of twenty (20) years’ service. However, no retired payment to any member shall exceed sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the average monthly salary received by a member for the four-year or two-year period, as the case may be, next preceding the filing of said application. Periods of time in which a member may have been inactive on account of physical or mental disability shall not be excluded in computing the twenty-year period and the seven-year period hereinbefore mentioned, provided the employee continues to contribute his share to the program based on the average of his last two (2) months’ compensation. This contribution shall continue during the total time the employee shall be inactive.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-12; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 12; Laws, 1972, ch. 370, § 2; Laws, 1985, ch. 399, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1985).

§ 21-29-35.
Duty disability retirement.

Upon application of a member in service of the employer, any member who has become totally and permanently incapacitated for duty as the natural and proximate result of the actual performance of duty of the employer, without wilful negligence on his part, may be retired by the board on a duty disability retirement allowance effective thirty days after the filing of an application in writing with the board. However, the physician or physicians selected by the board to examine the member shall certify that such member is presumably permanently and totally disabled from engaging in any gainful occupation for compensation or profit, that under the facts as to the cause of disability, as certified by the board, the member’s disability could have with reasonable probability resulted, in such physician’s opinion, and that such member should be retired.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-13; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 13.

§ 21-29-37.
Duty disability retirement allowance.

Upon retirement for duty disability, prior to becoming eligible for service retirement, as provided by Section 21-29-35, a member shall receive a duty disability retirement allowance, payable monthly, in a sum equal to fifty percent (50%) of his monthly salary from the employer at the time when the injury was sustained or the sickness occurred. This amount shall be paid to the member throughout such total disability for service. If the municipality pays a salary to such member in an amount equal to or in excess of the amount to be paid under this section, said member shall not be entitled to any payments under this section for the period of time during which such salary is paid.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-14; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 14; Laws, 1972, ch. 370, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 21-29-39.
Non-duty disability retirement.

Upon application of a member in service of the employer, any member who has had not less than five (5) years nor more than twenty (20) years’ service with the employer and who has become totally and permanently incapacitated for duty, as a result of causes occurring other than in the performance of his duty, shall be retired by the board not less than thirty (30) nor more than ninety (90) days next following the date of filing such application, on a non-duty disability retirement allowance. Any such disability shall be certified to the board in the same manner as provided in Section 21-29-35.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-15; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 15; Laws, 1972, ch. 370, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 21-29-41.
Non-duty disability retirement allowance.

Upon retirement for nonduty disability as provided in Section 21-29-39, a member shall receive for each year’s active service one-fortieth (1/40) of the average monthly salary or compensation received by such member from the employer in the four-year or two-year period, as the case may be, next preceding the injury or illness causing such disability.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-16; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 16; Laws, 1972, ch. 370, § 5; Laws, 1985, ch. 399, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1985).

§ 21-29-43.
Re-examination of disability retirants; revocation of allowance for gainful employment.

Once a year during the first five (5) years following retirement of a member on either duty or non-duty disability retirement allowance, and once in every three-year period thereafter, the board may require any disability beneficiary who has not completed twenty (20) years’ service under the terms and provisions of this article to undergo a medical examination at the place of residence of the beneficiary or other place mutually agreed upon, to be made by a physician or physicians designated by the board. Should any disability beneficiary who has not completed twenty (20) years’ service under the terms and provisions of this article refuse to submit to at least one (1) medical examination in any such year by a physician or physicians designated by the board, his allowance shall be discontinued until his withdrawal of such refusal, and should his refusal continue for one (1) year, all his rights in and to any and all retirement allowances under the retirement system shall be revoked by the board.

Should the examining physician or physicians report and certify to the board that a disability retirant has recovered and is able to engage in a gainful occupation, and should the board concur in such report, then the disability retirement allowance shall cease. In the case of a duty disability retirant only, upon again becoming an employee of the employer, he shall again become a member of the retirement system and the time during which he was a disability retirant shall be counted as time in the service of the employer for the purpose of service retirement.

Any disability retirant, who has not completed twenty (20) years’ service under this article prior to retirement, who secures gainful employment over a period of three (3) consecutive months shall not thereafter receive any disability retirement allowance and it shall be the duty of the board to revoke its order directing the payment of a retirement allowance to such person.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-18; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 18; Laws, 1972, ch. 370, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 26, 1972).

§ 21-29-45.
Death of member.

[For any municipality that has not elected to authorize the continuation of or reinstatement of spouse retirement benefits under the provisions of Section 21-29-329, this section shall read as follows:]

Upon proper application to the general retirement board, the benefits to dependents of deceased members and retirants shall be paid as follows:

If any member dies for causes other than the performance of duty in the service of the municipality before completing five (5) years’ service, there shall be paid to his or her designated beneficiary or his or her legal representative, if no beneficiary has been designated, from the employees’ savings fund the sum equal to the amount accumulated in his or her individual account.

If any member dies who has not had less than five (5) and not more than twenty (20) years’ service with the municipality, there shall be paid to the spouse, from the retirement reserve fund, for each year’s active service, not to exceed a period of twenty (20) years, one-fortieth (1/40) of the average monthly salary or compensation received by the member in the four-year or two-year period, as the case may be, next preceding the death, for the use of the spouse and the child or children of the deceased member under the age of eighteen (18) years, so long as the spouse remains unmarried. If, after the marriage of the spouse, there remains a child or children of the deceased member under the age of eighteen (18) years, the payments shall continue to be made to a parent or lawful custodian of the child or children without the necessity of appointment as guardian for the benefit of the child or children, so long as the child or children are under the age of eighteen (18) years. After the death or marriage of the spouse, all payments to the spouse shall cease, and after the death or attainment of eighteen (18) years of any child or children of the deceased, all payments to the child or children over eighteen (18) years of age shall cease. If the deceased member is not survived by a spouse or child or children under the age of eighteen (18) years, but is survived by a father or a mother dependent upon him or her, the payments shall continue to be made to the dependent father or mother, or both, so long as each lives. The word “dependent,” as used in this section, shall mean “wholly dependent,” as determined by the retirement board.

If any member dies after having completed twenty (20) years’ service as required by Section 21-29-31, or if any retirant dies, there shall be paid from the retirement reserve fund to the spouse or the dependents designated in paragraph (b) of this section, the amount of benefits or retirement pay equal to the sum being paid to the deceased member or retirant, or which would have been paid to the deceased member or retirant if he or she had applied for benefits under this section, on the date of his or her death.

If any member dies before becoming eligible to receive benefits under this article as a result of the performance of duty to the municipality, there shall be paid to the spouse or dependents designated in paragraph (b) of this section from the retirement reserve fund, an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of the monthly salary of the deceased member on the date of his or her death. This amount shall be paid to the same beneficiaries and for the same period of time as those beneficiaries and periods of time set forth in paragraph (b) of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 3652.3-17; Laws, 1948, ch. 386, § 17; Laws, 1972, ch. 370, § 6; Laws, 1985, ch. 399, § 3; Laws, 2004, ch. 561, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2004.